Hawaii statutes.
§460J-27 Penalties for unlicensed acts.
Any person or business organization that violates the provisions of section
460J-6 shall not be fined less than $5,000. [L 1972, c 134, pt of §1; am L
1986, c 126, §6]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next